District of Columbia statutes.
8-1056

Inspections.

(a)

The Mayor shall have the right to randomly and periodically inspect any solid waste facility located in the District, and all records, documents, or data compilations retained by the solid waste facility, for the purpose of ensuring compliance with this chapter. Inspections shall generally take place while the solid waste facility is in operation.

(b)

Pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall conduct, at a minimum, quarterly inspections of all solid waste facilities in the District to ensure compliance with section 903 of Title 20 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (20 DCMR § 903), section 733.1(a), (c), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (m), and (s) of Title 21 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (21 DCMR § 733.1(a), (c), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (m), and (s)), and any regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

Feb. 27, 1996, D.C. Law 11-94, § 7, 42 DCR 7172
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-188, § 2, 61 DCR 12114
1981 Ed., § 6-3456.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-188 designated the existing provision as (a); and added (b).
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 8-1051.